Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1319
Testing laboratory; purpose.

The department shall have the authority to maintain and develop a testing laboratory to carry out the requirements of the provisions of section 39-1318.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 19, p. 425.